Alaska statutes. Title 47. Welfare, Social Services, and Institutions.
Article 3. Adolescent Pregnancy Projects.

Sec. 47.18.100.
State funding authorized.

In order to encourage and support community-based initiatives to combat the many problems associated with adolescent pregnancy and parenthood, the department shall, from appropriations for that purpose, give grants or award contracts to fund a percentage of the cost of local projects designed to prevent adolescent pregnancy and assist adolescent parents in obtaining needed educational, vocational, and parenting skills.

History.

(§ 1 ch 94 SLA 1991)

Sec. 47.18.110.
Eligible projects.

Projects funded under AS

47.18.100

shall be designed with a holistic approach that recognizes the interconnectedness of adolescent parenthood and a broad array of related circumstances, such as low self-esteem, domestic violence, substance abuse, economic security, financial responsibilities of having a child, cultural integrity, sources of adolescent stress, parenting skills, educational and vocational opportunities, and access to reproductive health services.

Projects funded under AS

47.18.100

may include one or more of the following types of activities:

family life education;

counseling services for adolescents who are, or who may think they are, pregnant or who want to avoid pregnancy;

prenatal care for pregnant adolescents;

job training and placement for adolescent parents;

educational and support services for adolescent parents;

other activities that, in the judgment of the department, are likely to have a tangible effect on combating a problem associated with adolescent pregnancy or parenthood.

History.

(§ 1 ch 94 SLA 1991)

Sec. 47.18.120.
Applications for project funding.

A person or group seeking funding under AS

47.18.100

shall apply to the department on a form provided by the department.

When applying under (a) of this section, the applicant must demonstrate to the satisfaction of the department that the proposed project

has been designed with extensive assistance from local community members who represent a variety of interests, cultures, and perspectives on adolescent pregnancy and parenthood;

is based on sound research, to the maximum extent possible;

will maximize collaboration among all relevant agencies involved in the needs being addressed by the project;

includes an evaluation component to measure project effectiveness;

includes a public awareness campaign component.

History.

(§ 1 ch 94 SLA 1991)

Sec. 47.18.140.
Promotion of program and projects.

The department shall take appropriate actions to publicize the availability of funds under AS

47.18.100

—

47.18.140

.

The department shall annually conduct regional conferences or workshops across the state to

showcase the activities and achievements of projects funded under AS

47.18.100

—

47.18.140

for which the evaluation components have shown a high level of success;

encourage and support the replication of these successful projects; and

increase public awareness of the availability of state administered services and programs to address the many problems associated with adolescent pregnancy and parenthood.

History.

(§ 1 ch 94 SLA 1991)